test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-luojk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Loanwords. Assmilated loan words: Lexicons PREMIE, KULTUR, FAKTOR, INSPEKTØR, TELEFON, INSTITUTION, MISSION, PENSION, BENSIN,MASKIN, ADJEKTIV, ANTIKK, APOTEK, ADVOKAT, BUDSJETT, INTERNETT, INSTITUTT, PARTISIPP, ALLEGORI, PATENT, VARIANT, PARADIS, KOLLEKT, TEKSTIL, SYSTEM, AGRONOM, ADVERB, TABELL, AREAL, TELEGRAM, ORGAN, SEMINAR, SBSTANS, VALENS, TURIST, FANATISM, DERMAGOG, BOAKSA, ALKOHOL, MUORRA_LOAN. Unassimilated loan words: Lexicons KINO_UNASS, CELSIUS_UNASS, BIDUS_UNASS. Assimilated loan words in regular lexicons, like NOADE, SÅHKÅR

Tests:

  Noun - kuntoj: # 
    kuntoj+N+Sg+Nom: kuntoj
    kuntoj+N+Sg+Acc: [kunntuv, kunntuhav]
    kuntoj+N+Pl+Com: [kunntuj, kunntuhij]
    kuntoj+N+Ess: [kunntun, kunton, kunntuhin]

  Noun - priemij: # PREMIE
    priemij+N+Sg+Nom: [priemij,premij]
    priemij+N+Sg+Gen: [priebmiha, prebmiha]
    priemij+N+Sg+Acc: [priebmihav, prebmihav]
    priemij+N+Sg+Ine: [priebmihin, prebmihin]
    priemij+N+Sg+Ill: [priebmihij, prebmihij]
    priemij+N+Sg+Ela: [priebmihis, prebmihis]
    priemij+N+Sg+Com: [priebmihijn, prebmihijn]
    priemij+N+Pl+Nom: [priebmiha, prebmiha]
    priemij+N+Pl+Gen: [priebmihij, prebmihij]
    priemij+N+Pl+Acc: [priebmihijt, prebmihijt]
    priemij+N+Pl+Ine: [priebmihijn, prebmihijn]
    priemij+N+Pl+Ill: [priebmihijda, prebmihijda]
    priemij+N+Pl+Ela: [priebmihijs, prebmihijs]
    priemij+N+Pl+Com: [priebmihij, prebmihij]
    priemij+N+Ess: [priebmihin, prebmihin, priemin, premin]
    priemij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [priebmihasj, prebmihasj]
    priemij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [priebmihattjasj, prebmihattjasj]
    priemij+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    priemij+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [priebmihahtes, prebmihahtes]
    priemij+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: [priebmihahttása, prebmihahttása, priebmihahttá, prebmihahttá]
    priemij+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    priemij+N+Abe: [priebmihahtá, prebmihahtá, priebmihahti, prebmihahti]

  Noun - håhkij: # PREMIE
    håhkij+N+Sg+Nom: håhkij
    håhkij+N+Sg+Gen: håhkkiha
    håhkij+N+Sg+Acc: håhkkihav
    håhkij+N+Sg+Ine: håhkkihin
    håhkij+N+Sg+Ill: håhkkihij
    håhkij+N+Sg+Ela: håhkkihis
    håhkij+N+Sg+Com: håhkkihijn
    håhkij+N+Pl+Nom: håhkkiha
    håhkij+N+Pl+Gen: håhkkihij
    håhkij+N+Pl+Acc: håhkkihijt
    håhkij+N+Pl+Ine: håhkkihijn
    håhkij+N+Pl+Ill: håhkkihijda
    håhkij+N+Pl+Ela: håhkkihijs
    håhkij+N+Pl+Com: håhkkihij
    håhkij+N+Ess: [håhkkihin, håhkin]
    håhkij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: håhkkihasj
    håhkij+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: håhkkihattjasj
    håhkij+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    håhkij+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: håhkkihahtes
    håhkij+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: [håhkkihahttása, håhkkihahttá]
    håhkij+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    håhkij+N+Abe: [håhkkihahtá, håhkkihahti]

  Noun - muvrra: # KULTUR
    muvrra+N+Sg+Nom: muvrra
    muvrra+N+Sg+Acc: muvrav
    muvrra+N+Sg+Com: muvrajn
    muvrra+N+Ess: muvrran
    muvrra+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: muvralasj


  Noun - tastatuvrra: # KULTUR
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Nom: tastatuvrra
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Acc: tastatuvrav
    tastatuvrra+N+Sg+Com: tastatuvrajn
    tastatuvrra+N+Ess: tastatuvrran

  Noun - guovllokontåvrrå: # FAKTOR
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom: guovllokontåvrrå
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Sg+Acc: guovllokontåvråv
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Pl+Com: guovllokontåvråj
    guovllokontåvrrå+N+Ess: guovllokontåvrrån

  Noun - generatåvrrå: # FAKTOR
    generatåvrrå+N+Sg+Nom: generatåvrrå
    generatåvrrå+N+Sg+Acc: generatåvråv
    generatåvrrå+N+Pl+Com: generatåvråj
    generatåvrrå+N+Ess: generatåvrrån
    generatåvrrå+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: generatåvrålasj


  Noun - kommandørra: # INSPETØR
    kommanderra+N+Sg+Nom: kommanderra
    kommanderra+N+Sg+Acc: kommanderav
    kommanderra+N+Sg+Ill: kommanderraj
    kommanderra+N+Der/lasj+A+Attr: kommanderalasj


  Noun - kanåvnnå: # TELEFON
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: kanåvnnå
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: kanåvnån
    kanåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: kanåvnnåj

  Noun - kvalifikasjåvnnå: # INSTITUTION
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: kvalifikasjåvnnå
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Gen: kvalifikasjåvnå
    kvalifikasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: kvalifikasjåvnnåj

  Noun - miehttsekommisjåvnnå: # MISSION
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: miehttsekommisjåvnnå
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: miehttsekommisjåvnån
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: miehttsekommisjåvnnåj
    miehttsekommisjåvnnå+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Acc: miehttsekommisjåvnålattjav

  Noun - provisjåvnnå: # PENSION
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom: provisjåvnnå
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ine: provisjåvnån
    provisjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ill: provisjåvnnåj

  Noun - rosijnna: # BENSIN
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Nom: [rosijnna, russijnna]
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Ine: [rosijnan, russijnan]
    rosijnna+N+Sg+Ill: [rosijnnaj, russijnnaj]

  Noun - goarrommasjijnna: # MASKIN
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom: goarrommasjijnna
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Ine: goarrommasjijnan
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Sg+Ill: goarrommasjijnnaj
    goarrommasjijnna+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ela: goarrommasjijnalattjas

  Noun - habitijvva: # ADJEKTIV
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Nom: habitijvva
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Ine: habitijvan
    habitijvva+N+Sg+Ill: habitijvvaj

  Noun - heraldihkka: # ANTIKK
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Nom: [heraldihkka, heraldijkka]
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Ine: [heraldihkan, heraldijkan]
    heraldihkka+N+Sg+Ill: [heraldihkkaj, heraldijkkaj]

  Noun - diskotiehkka: # APOTEK
    diskotiehkka+N+Sg+Nom: [diskotähkka, diskotiehkka]
    diskotiehkka+N+Sg+Ine: [diskotehkan, diskotiehkan]
    diskotiehkka+N+Sg+Ill: [diskotähkkaj, diskotiehkkaj]

  Noun - álggomandáhtta: # ADVOKAT
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Nom: álggomandáhtta
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Ine: álggomandáhtan
    álggomandáhtta+N+Sg+Ill: álggomandáhttaj
    álggomandáhtta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Ine: álggomandáhtalattjan

  Noun - åhpadusnæhtta: # BUDSJETT
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Nom: [åhpadusnæhtta, åhpadusnähtta]
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Ine: åhpadusnehtan
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Sg+Ill: [åhpadusnæhttaj, åhpadusnähttaj]
    åhpadusnæhtta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Gen: åhpadusnehtalattja

  Noun - internæhtta: # INTERNET
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Nom: [internæhtta, internähtta]
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Ine: internehtan
    internæhtta+N+Sg+Ill: [internæhttaj, internähttaj]

  Noun - kvartsihtta: # INSTITUTT
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Nom: [kvartsihtta, kvartsijtta]
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Ine: [kvartsihtan, kvartsijtan]
    kvartsihtta+N+Sg+Ill: [kvartsihttaj, kvartsijttaj]

  Noun - minuhtta: # INSTITUTT
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Nom: [minuhtta, minuvtta]
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Ine: [minuhtan, minuvtan]
    minuhtta+N+Sg+Ill: [minuhttaj, minuvttaj]

  Noun - prinsihppa: # PARTISIPP
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Nom: [prinsihppa, prinsijppa]
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Ine: [prinsihpan, prinsijpan]
    prinsihppa+N+Sg+Ill: [prinsihppaj, prinsijppaj]

#  Noun - prosodijja: # ALLEGORI
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Nom: prosodijja
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Nom: [prosodiddja, prosodijja]
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Ine: prosodijjan
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Ine: [prosodidjan, prosodijjan]
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Ill: prosodijjaj
#    prosodijja+N+Sg+Ill: [prosodiddjaj, prosodijjaj]

  Noun - sakramænnta: # PATENT
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Nom: [sakramænnta, sakramännta]
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Ine: sakramentan
    sakramænnta+N+Sg+Ill: [sakramænntaj, sakramänntaj]

  Noun - sergeánnta: # VARIANT
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Nom: sergeánnta
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Ine: sergeántan
    sergeánnta+N+Sg+Ill: sergeánntaj

  Noun - avijssa: # PARADIS
    avijssa+N+Sg+Nom: avijssa
    avijssa+N+Sg+Ine: avijsan
    avijssa+N+Sg+Ill: avijssaj

  Noun - effækta: # KOLLEKT
    effækta+N+Sg+Nom: [effækta, effäkta]
    effækta+N+Sg+Ine: effevtan
    effækta+N+Sg+Ill: [effæktaj, effäktaj]

  Noun - klusijlla: # TEKSTIL
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Nom: klusijlla
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Ine: klusijlan
    klusijlla+N+Sg+Ill: klusijllaj

  Noun - metersystiebma: # SYSTEM
    metersystiebma+N+Sg+Nom: [metersystebma, metersystiebma]
    metersystiebma+N+Sg+Ine: [metersysteman, metersystieman]
    metersystiebma+N+Sg+Ill: [metersystebmaj,metersystiebmaj]

  Noun - symptåvmmå: # AGRONOM
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom: symptåvmmå
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Ine: symptåvmån
    symptåvmmå+N+Sg+Ill: symptåvmmåj
    symptåvmmå+N+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Gen: [] #gádodam -lasj suorgudimev AGRONOM leksikåvnås


  Noun - viehkkeværbba: # ADVERB
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Nom: [viehkkeværbba, viehkkevärbba]
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Ine: viehkkeverban
    viehkkeværbba+N+Sg+Ill: [viehkkeværbbaj, viehkkevärbbaj]

  Noun - hotælla: # TABELL
    hotælla+N+Sg+Nom: [hotælla, hotälla]
    hotælla+N+Sg+Ine: hotellan
    hotælla+N+Sg+Ill: [hotællaj, hotällaj]

  Noun - ideálla: # AREAL
    ideálla+N+Sg+Nom: ideálla
    ideálla+N+Sg+Ine: ideálan
    ideálla+N+Sg+Ill: ideállaj

  Noun - kardiográmma: # TELEGRAM
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Nom: kardiográmma
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Ine: kardiográmman
    kardiográmma+N+Sg+Ill: kardiográmmaj

  Noun - kontopládna: # ORGAN
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Nom: [kontopládna, kontoplánna]
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Ine: kontoplánan
    kontopládna+N+Sg+Ill: [kontopládnaj, kontoplánnaj]

  Noun - lineárra: # SEMINAR
    lineárra+N+Sg+Nom: lineárra
    lineárra+N+Sg+Ine: lineáran
    lineárra+N+Sg+Ill: lineárraj

  Noun - relevánssa: # SBSTANS
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Nom: relevánssa
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Ine: relevánsan
    relevánssa+N+Sg+Ill: relevánssaj

  Noun - sekvænssa: # VALENS
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Nom: [sekvænssa, sekvänssa]
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Ine: sekvensan
    sekvænssa+N+Sg+Ill: [sekvænssaj, sekvänssaj]

  Noun - seminarissta: # TURIST
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Nom: seminarissta
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Ine: seminaristan
    seminarissta+N+Sg+Ill: seminarisstaj
  
  Noun - aksjonissta: # TURISSTA
    aksjonissta+N+Sg+Nom: [aksjonissta, aktionissta]
    aksjonissta+N+Sg+Acc: [aksjonistav, aktionistav]
    aksjonissta+N+Pl+Com: [aksjonistaj, aktionistaj]
    aksjonissta+N+Ess: [aktionisstan, aksjonisstan]
    aksjonissta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [aktionistasj, aksjonistasj]

  Noun - singularissma: # FANATISM
    singularissma+N+Sg+Nom: singularissma
    singularissma+N+Sg+Ine: singularisman
    singularissma+N+Sg+Ill: singularissmaj
    singularissma+N+Der/lasj+A+Pl+Ill: singularismalattjajda


  Noun - etnologa: # DEMAGOG
    etnolåvggå+N+Sg+Nom: etnolåvggå
    etnolåvggå+N+Sg+Ine: etnolåvgån
    etnolåvggå+N+Sg+Ill: etnolåvggåj

  Noun - poasstaboaksa: # BOAKSA
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Nom: poasstaboaksa
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Acc: poasstabåvsav
    poasstaboaksa+N+Sg+Com: poasstabåvsajn
    poasstaboaksa+N+Ess: poasstaboaksan

  Noun - radio: # KINO_UNASS
    radio+N+Sg+Nom: radio
    radio+N+Sg+Acc: radiov
    radio+N+Sg+Com: radiojn
    radio+N+Ess: radion
    
  Noun - alkohåvllå: # ALKOHOL
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Nom: alkohåvllå
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Acc: alkohåvlåv
    alkohåvllå+N+Sg+Com: alkohåvlåjn
    alkohåvllå+N+Ess: alkohåvllån
    alkohåvllå+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkohåvlåsj
  
  Noun - alfa: # KINO_UNASS
    alfa+N+Sg+Nom: alfa
    alfa+N+Sg+Gen: alfa
    alfa+N+Sg+Acc: alfav
    alfa+N+Sg+Ine: alfan
    alfa+N+Sg+Ill: alfaj
    alfa+N+Pl+Nom: alfa
    alfa+N+Pl+Ela: alfajs
    alfa+N+Pl+Com: alfaj
    alfa+N+Ess: alfan
    alfa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alfasj
    alfa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alfatjasj
    alfa+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: alfadibme
    alfa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alfa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: []
    alfa+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: alfalasj
    alfa+N+Abe: [alfadak, alfada]
